Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska58-610
Act, how cited.

Sections 58-610 to 58-619 shall be known and be cited as the Nebraska Uniform Prudent Management of Institutional Funds Act.

Laws 2007, LB136, § 1.